Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 53 O.S. 2021, Section 1.18, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1.18. The Oklahoma Historical Society shall dispense
funds for historical purposes only as defined provided by paragraph
6 of Section 6 of this act the Oklahoma Historical Preservation Act.
The Oklahoma Historical Society may enter into contracts with other
state agencies or nonprofit corporations holding a valid exemption
from taxation issued pursuant to Section 501(a) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and listed as an exempt
organization in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, of the United States, as amended, or with individuals or
associations pursuant to statutory requirements.
Funds shall not be applied, donated or used directly or
indirectly for the use, benefit or support of any sect, church,

denomination or system of religion, or for the use, benefit or
support of any priest, preacher, minister, or other religious
teacher or dignitary, or sectarian institution as such.
The Oklahoma Historical Society shall provide opportunity to
organizations to submit written applications to be received and
acted upon by the Oklahoma Historical Society. At the conclusion of
the contract, each state agency, nonprofit corporation, individual,
or association shall provide the Oklahoma Historical Society with
proof of fulfillment of the contract in proper order and must shall
be affirmed on the proper form, provided by the Oklahoma Historical
Society, by the managing officers of the state agency, nonprofit
group, association, or individual making the contract.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 53 O.S. 2021, Section 171, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 171. The Oklahoma Arts Council shall dispense funds for
arts purposes only. The Oklahoma Arts Council shall enter into
contracts with other state agencies or nonprofit corporations
holding a valid exemption from taxation issued pursuant to Section
501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, 1954 of 1986, as amended, and
listed as an exempt organization in Section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code, 1954, of the United States of 1986, as
amended. These nonprofit corporations must demonstrate that the
goods and services provided meet the intent of the state policy
provided in this act Section 162 of this title.
Funds shall not be applied, donated or used directly or
indirectly for the use, benefit or support of any sect, church,
denomination or system of religion, or for the use, benefit, or
support of any priest, preacher, minister, or other religious
teacher or dignitary, or sectarian institution as such.
The Oklahoma Arts Council shall provide opportunity, by public
notices, to all organizations interested in providing these goods
and services, who will submit written applications to be received
and acted upon by the Oklahoma Arts Council. At the conclusion of
the contract, each state agency or nonprofit corporation shall
provide the Oklahoma Arts Council with proof of fulfillment of the
contract in proper order and must shall be affirmed on the proper
ENR. S. B. NO. 1307 Page 2

form, provided by the Oklahoma Arts Council, by the managing
officers of the state agency or nonprofit group making the contract.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 53 O.S. 2021, Section 201C, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 213, O.S.L. 2022 (53 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 201C), is amended to read as follows:
Section 201C. A. The J.M. Davis Memorial Commission shall have
power and authority to:
1. Appoint and to fix the salaries and duties of the
professional and administrative employees and curators as may be
necessary to carry out the purpose of this act 201A et seq. of this
title;
2. Appoint an executive director who shall serve at the
pleasure of the Commission. A member of the Commission may be
appointed as the executive director; provided, if a member of the
Commission is so appointed, the member shall resign as a member of
the Commission and the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as
are original appointments;
3. Provide for the proper housing, protection and display of
the J.M. Davis Gun Collection and other historical artifacts; and
4. Enter into contracts for services to be performed in
furtherance of the authorized activities and duties of the J.M.
Davis Memorial Commission with other state agencies or nonprofit
corporations holding a valid exemption from taxation issued pursuant
to Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
and listed as an exempt organization in Section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or with individuals or
associations pursuant to statutory requirements.
B. Funds of the J.M. Davis Memorial Commission shall not be
applied, donated, or used directly or indirectly for the use,
benefit, or support of any sect, church, denomination, or system of
religion, or for the use, benefit, or support of any priest,
preacher, minister, or other religious teacher or dignitary, or
sectarian institution as such. The J.M. Davis Memorial Commission
shall provide opportunity to organizations to submit written
applications to be received and acted upon by the J.M. Davis
ENR. S. B. NO. 1307 Page 3

Memorial Commission. At the conclusion of the contract, each state
agency, nonprofit corporation, individual, or association shall
provide the J.M. Davis Memorial Commission with proof of fulfillment
of the contract in proper order and must shall be affirmed on the
proper form, provided by the J.M. Davis Memorial Commission, by the
managing officers of the state agency, nonprofit group, association,
or individual making the contract.
C. Any agreements or contracts providing for the employment of
persons or to purchase property or equipment or the construction of
any facilities shall not be authorized unless necessary funds have
been appropriated by the Legislature or have been otherwise obtained
from gifts, grants or contributions actually received by the
Commission.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1307 Page 4

Passed the Senate the 23rd day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1307 Page 5